New Jersey, session 221, S72.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Health shall develop a standardized perinatal health curriculum for training community health workers in the provision of education and support services to women of childbearing age.  The curriculum shall include basic educational information and materials concerning factors and behaviors that affect maternal and infant health and childbirth, including, but not limited to: alcohol and substance use during pregnancy; maternal medical conditions that affect pregnancy; premature births and low birthweight babies; cesarean sections and labor induction; labor and delivery; infant mortality; breastfeeding; shaken baby syndrome; perinatal mood disorders ; and the signs, symptoms, and risk factors most commonly associated with maternal and infant mortality and mobidity.  The curriculum shall further include information on: shared decision making; informed consent; and resources available in the State for women, including, but not limited to, the resources and referrals available through the county central intake agencies. The department may, in developing the curriculum, utilize information or resources developed by another state, a professional association with expertise in maternal and infant health, or an agency of the federal government. The department shall promote and share the curriculum as best practices for community doulas , nurse home visitors, and childbirth educators in the State, in order to increase access by women to current information concerning perinatal health. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.